North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.4 Streamlined Sales And Use Tax Agreement
57-39.4-15. (314)
Telecommunications sourcing.

Except for the defined telecommunications services in subsection 3, the sale of telecommunications services sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that jurisdiction or each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or terminates and in which the service address is also located.

Except for the defined telecommunications services in subsection 3, a sale of telecommunications services sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis is sourced to the customer’s place of primary use.

The sale of the following telecommunications services shall be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction as follows:

A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than air-to-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is sourced to the customer’s place of primary use as required by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act.

A sale of post-paid calling service is sourced to the origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified by either the seller’s telecommunications system, or information received by the seller from its service provider, if the system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.

A sale of prepaid calling service or a sale of a prepaid wireless calling service is sourced in accordance with section 57-39.4-11. However, in the case of a sale of prepaid wireless calling service, the rule provided in subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 57-39.4-11 shall include as an option the location associated with the mobile telephone number.

A sale of a private communication service is sourced as follows:

Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which such customer channel termination point is located.

Service where all customer termination points are located entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located.

Service for segments of a channel between two customer channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located.

Service for segments of a channel located in more than one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel termination points in such jurisdiction by the total number of customer channel termination points.

The sale of internet access service is sourced to the customer’s place of primary use.

The sale of an ancillary service is sourced to the customer’s place of primary use.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 13.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of Sales, Use, and Utility Taxes on Retail Transactions of Internet Sellers and Internet Access Providers. 30 A.L.R.6th 341.

57-39.4-16. (315)
Telecommunications sourcing definitions.

For the purpose of section 57-39.4-15, the following definitions apply:

“Air-to-ground radiotelephone service” means a radio service, as that term is defined in 47 CFR 22.99, in which common carriers are authorized to offer and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in aircraft.

“Ancillary services” means services that are associated with or incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including detailed telecommunications billing, directory assistance, vertical service, and voice mail services.

“Call-by-call basis” means any method of charging for telecommunications services in which the price is measured by individual calls.

“Communications channel” means a physical or virtual path of communications over which signals are transmitted between or among customer channel termination points.

“Customer” means the person or entity that contracts with the seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user of the telecommunications services is the customer of the telecommunications services, but this sentence only applies for the purpose of sourcing sales of telecommunications services under section 57-39.4-15. “Customer” does not include a reseller of telecommunications services or for mobile telecommunications services of a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the home service provider’s licensed service area.

“Customer channel termination point” means the location where the customer either inputs or receives the communications.

“End user” means the person who utilizes the telecommunications services. In the case of an entity, “end user” means the individual who utilizes the services on behalf of the entity.

“Home service provider” means the same as that term is defined in section 124(5) of Public Law 106-252, Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act.

“Mobile telecommunications service” means the same as that term is defined in section 124(7) of Public Law 106-252, Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act.

“Place of primary use” means the street address representative of where the customer’s use of the telecommunications services primarily occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile telecommunications services, “place of primary use” must be within the licensed service area of the home service provider.

“Post-paid calling service” means the telecommunications services obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to which a telephone number which is not associated with the origination or termination of the telecommunications services. A post-paid calling service includes telecommunications services, except a prepaid wireless calling service, that would be a prepaid calling service except it is not exclusively telecommunications services.

“Prepaid calling service” means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and which enables the origination of calls using an access number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

“Prepaid wireless calling service” means a telecommunications service that provides the right to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services, including the download of digital products delivered electronically, content and ancillary services, which must be paid for in advance that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

“Private communication service” means telecommunications services that entitle the customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel or group of channels between or among termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in connection with the use of such channel or channels.

“Service address” means:

The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a customer’s call is charged and from which the call originates or terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid.

If the location in subdivision a is not known, service address means the origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services first identified by either the seller’s telecommunications system or in information received by the seller from its service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.

If the location in subdivisions a and b are not known, the service address means the location of the customer’s place of primary use.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 10; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 14.

57-39.4-17. (316)
Enactment of exemptions.

A member state shall enact entity-based, use-based, and product-based exemptions in accordance with the provisions of this section and utilize common definitions in accordance with the provisions of section 57-39.4-28 and the agreement.

A member state may enact a product-based exemption without restriction if the agreement does not have a definition for the product.

A member state may enact a product-based exemption for a product if the agreement has a definition for such product and the member state utilizes in the exemption the product definition in a manner consistent with the agreement and section 57-39.4-28.

A member state may enact a product-based exemption exempting all items included within a definition in the agreement but shall not exempt specific items included within the product definition unless the product definition sets out an exclusion for such item.

A member state may enact an entity-based or a use-based exemption for a product without restriction if the agreement does not have a definition for the product.

A member state may enact an entity-based or a use-based exemption for a product if the agreement has a definition for such product and the member state utilizes in the exemption the product definition in a manner consistent with the agreement and section 57-39.4-28.

A member state may enact an entity-based exemption for an item if the agreement does not have a definition for such items but has a definition for a product that includes such item.

A member state may not enact a use-based exemption for an item which effectively constitutes a product-based exemption if the agreement has a definition for a product that includes such item.

A member state may enact a use-based exemption for an item if the agreement has a definition for a product that includes such item, if not prohibited in subdivision c and if consistent with a definition in the agreement.

For purposes of complying with the requirements in this section, the inclusion of a product within the definition of tangible personal property is disregarded.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 15.

57-39.4-18. (317)
Administration of exemptions.

Each member state shall observe the following provisions when a purchaser claims an exemption:

The seller shall obtain identifying information of the purchaser and the reason for claiming a tax exemption at the time of the purchase as determined by the governing board.

A purchaser is not required to provide a signature to claim an exemption from tax unless a paper exemption certificate is used.

The seller shall use the standard form for claiming an exemption electronically as adopted by the governing board.

The seller shall obtain the same information for proof of a claimed exemption regardless of the medium in which the transaction occurred.

A member state may utilize a system in which the purchaser exempt from the payment of the tax is issued an identification number that shall be presented to the seller at the time of the sale.

The seller shall maintain proper records of exempt transactions and provide them to a member state when requested.

A member state shall administer use-based and entity-based exemptions when practicable through a direct pay permit, an exemption certificate, or another means that does not burden sellers.

In the case of drop shipment sales, member states must allow a third-party vendor, drop shipper, to claim a resale exemption based on an exemption certificate by its customer or reseller or any other acceptable information available to the third-party vendor evidencing qualification for a resale exemption, regardless of whether the customer or reseller is registered to collect and remit sales and use tax in the state where the sale is sourced.

Each member state shall relieve sellers that follow the requirements of this section from the tax otherwise applicable if it is determined that the purchaser improperly claimed an exemption and to hold the purchaser liable for the nonpayment of tax. This relief from liability does not apply to a seller who fraudulently fails to collect the tax; to a seller who solicits purchasers to participate in the unlawful claim of an exemption; to a seller who accepts an exemption certificate when the purchaser claims an entity-based exemption when the subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the exemption certificate is actually received by the purchaser at a location operated by the seller and the state in which that location resides provides an exemption certificate that clearly and affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in that state. Graying out exemption reason types on the uniform form and posting it on a state’s website is an indicator.

Each member state shall relieve a seller of the tax otherwise applicable if the seller obtains a fully completed exemption certificate or captures the relevant data elements required under the agreement within ninety days subsequent to the date of sale. A member state may provide for a period longer than ninety days for the seller to obtain the necessary information.

If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate or all relevant data elements as provided by this section, a member state shall provide the seller with one hundred twenty days subsequent to a request for substantiation by a member state, to either obtain:

A fully completed exemption certificate from the purchaser, taken in good faith which means that the seller obtain a certificate that claims an exemption that was statutorily available on the date of the transaction in the jurisdiction where the transaction is sourced, could be applicable to the item being purchased, and is reasonable for the purchaser’s type of business; or

Other information establishing that the transaction was not subject to the tax. A member state may provide for a period longer than one hundred twenty days for sellers to obtain the necessary information.

If the seller obtains the information described in this subsection, the member state shall relieve the seller of any liability for the tax on the transaction unless it is discovered through the audit process that the seller had knowledge or had reason to know at the time such information was provided that the information relating to the exemption claimed was materially false or the seller otherwise knowingly participated in activity intended to purposefully evade the tax that is properly due on the transaction. The state must establish that the seller had knowledge or had reason to know at the time the information was provided that the information was materially false.

Nothing in this section shall affect the ability of member states to require purchasers to update exemption certificate information or to reapply with the state to claim certain exemptions.

Each member state shall relieve a seller of the tax otherwise applicable if it obtains a blanket exemption certificate from a purchaser with which the seller has a recurring business relationship. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 5, a member state may not request from the seller renewal of blanket certificates or updates of exemption certificate information or data elements when there is a recurring business relationship between the buyer and seller. For purposes of this section, a recurring business relationship exists when a period of no more than twelve months elapses between sales transactions.

Each state shall post on its website the uniform paper exemption certificate, streamlined sales and use tax exemption certificate, as revised and adopted by the governing board, with any applicable graying out of nonapplicable exemption types under subsection 2.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 16; 2011, ch. 473, § 13.

57-39.4-19. (318)
Uniform tax returns.

Each member state shall:

Require that only a single tax return for each taxing period for each seller be filed for the member state to include all the taxing jurisdictions within the member state.

Require that returns be due no sooner than the twentieth day of the month following the month in which the transaction occurred.

When the due date for a return falls on a Saturday or Sunday or legal holiday in the subject member state, the return shall be due on the next succeeding business day. If the return is filed in conjunction with a remittance and the remittance cannot be made under subdivision b of subsection 5 of section 57-39.4-20, the return shall be accepted as timely filed on the same day as the remittance under that subsection.

Make available to all sellers, whether or not registered under the agreement, except sellers of products qualifying for exclusion from the provisions of section 57-39.4-09 of this agreement, a simplified return that is filed electronically as follows:

The simplified electronic return hereinafter SER shall be in a form approved by the governing board and shall contain only those fields approved by the governing board. The SER shall contain two parts. Part 1 shall contain information relating to remittances and allocations and part 2 shall contain information relating to exempt sales.

Each member state must notify the governing board if it requires the submission of the part 2 information provided no state may require the submission of part 2 information from a model 4 seller which has no legal requirement to register in the state.

Returns shall be required as follows:

Certified service providers must file an SER in all member states in which the model 1 seller is registered under the agreement, on behalf of model 1 sellers. Certified service providers, on behalf of these sellers, shall file the audit reports provided for in article V of the rules and procedures of the agreement for the states, and in addition, shall be required to file part 1 of the SER each month for each member state in which the model 1 seller is registered under the agreement. A state shall allow a model 1 seller to file both part 1 and part 2 of the SER. A model 1 seller which chooses to file both part 1 and part 2 of the SER shall still be required to file the audit reports provided for in article V of the rules and procedures of the agreement.

Model 2 and model 3 sellers must file an SER in all member states in which they are registered under the agreement. These sellers shall file part 1 of the SER every month for all states in which they are registered under the agreement. These sellers shall have the following options for meeting their obligation to furnish part 2 information:

File part 2 of the SER together with part 1 of the SER every month; or

File part 2 of the SER at the same time part 1 of the SER for the month of December is due. Part 2 information filed under this option shall cover the month of December and all previous months of the same calendar year and shall only require annual and not monthly totals. The sellers shall only be required to file part 2 of the SER for any state which has notified the governing board that it will require the submission of the part 2 information under subdivision b.

Every member state shall allow model 4 sellers to file an SER. The sellers shall file part 1 of the SER every month unless a state allows less frequent filing. Model 4 sellers which have a legal requirement to register in the state shall have the following options for meeting their obligation to furnish part 2 information:

File part 2 of the SER together with part 1 of the SER; or

File part 2 of the SER at the same time part 1 of the SER for the month of December is due. Part 2 information filed under this option shall cover the month of December and all previous months of the same calendar year and shall only require annual and not monthly totals.

Every member state shall allow sellers not registered under the agreement that are registered in the state to file an SER. These sellers shall file part 1 of the SER every month unless a state allows less frequent filing and shall have the following options for meeting their obligation to furnish part 2 information:

File part 2 of the SER together with part 1 of the SER; or

File part 2 of the SER at the same time part 1 of the SER for the month of December is due. Part 2 information filed under this option shall cover the month of December and all previous months of the same calendar year and shall only require annual and not monthly totals.

A state which requires the submission of part 2 information under paragraph 2 may provide an exemption from this requirement to a seller under terms and conditions set out by the state.

A state may require a seller which elects to file an SER to give at least three months’ notice of the seller’s intent to discontinue filing an SER.

Adopt web services as the standardized transmission process that allows for receipt of uniform tax returns and other formatted information as approved by the governing board. The process must provide for the filing of separate returns for multiple legal entities in a single transmission for each state and will not include any requirement for manual entry or input by the seller of any of the aforementioned information. This process will allow a certified service provider, tax preparer, or any other authorized person to file returns for more than one seller in a single electronic transmission. However, sellers filing returns for multiple legal entities may only do so for affiliated legal entities.

Give notice to a seller registered under this agreement which has no legal requirement to register in the state, of a failure to file a required return and a minimum of thirty days to file thereafter prior to establishing a liability amount for taxes based solely on the seller’s failure to timely file a return provided a member state may establish a liability amount for taxes based solely on the seller’s failure to timely file a return if such seller has a history of nonfiling or late filing.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a state from allowing additional return options or the filing of returns less frequently.

These sellers shall only be required to file part 2 of the SER for any state which has notified the governing board that it will require the submission of the part 2 information under subdivision b.

Model 4 sellers which elect not to file an SER shall file returns in the form under schedules afforded to sellers not registered under the agreement according to the requirements of each member state.

These sellers shall only be required to file part 2 of the SER for any state which has notified the governing board that it will require the submission of the part 2 information under subdivision b.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2011, ch. 473, § 14; 2017, ch. 407, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 477, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

57-39.4-20. (319)
Uniform rules for remittance of funds.

Each member state shall:

Require only one remittance for each return except as provided in this subsection. If any additional remittance is required, it may only be required from sellers that collect more than thirty thousand dollars in sales and use taxes in the member state during the preceding calendar year as provided in the agreement. The state shall allow the amount of any additional remittance to be determined through a calculation method rather than actual collections. Any additional remittances shall not require the filing of an additional return.

Require, at each member state’s discretion, all remittances in payment of taxes reported on the approved simplified return format to be remitted electronically.

Allow for electronic payments by all remitters by both automated clearinghouse credit and automated clearinghouse debit.

Provide an alternative method for making same day payments if an electronic funds transfer fails.

Provide that if a due date for a payment falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday in a member state, the payment, including any related payment voucher information, is due to that state on the next succeeding business day.

Additionally, if the federal reserve bank is closed on a due date that prohibits a person from being able to make a payment by automated clearinghouse debit or credit, that payment shall be accepted as timely if made on the next day the federal reserve bank is open.

Require that any data that accompanies a remittance be formatted using uniform tax type and payment type codes approved by the governing board.

Adopt a standardized transmission process approved by the governing board that allows for the remittance in an SER of a single bulk payment for taxes reported on multiple SERs by affiliated entities, certified service providers, or preparers. Each state shall comply with this provision no later than two years after the governing board approves such a standardized transmission process.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2007, ch. 528, § 21; 2011, ch. 473, § 15.

57-39.4-21. (320)
Uniform rules for recovery of bad debts.

Each member state shall use the following to provide a deduction for bad debts to a seller. To the extent a member state provides a bad debt deduction to any other party, the same procedures will apply. Each member state shall:

Allow a deduction from taxable sales for bad debts. Any deduction taken that is attributed to bad debts shall not include interest.

Utilize the federal definition of “bad debt” in 26 U.S.C. 166 as the basis for calculating bad debt recovery. However, the amount calculated pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 166 shall be adjusted to exclude financing charges or interest, sales or use taxes charged on the purchase price, uncollectible amounts on property that remain in the possession of the seller until the full purchase price is paid, expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt, and repossessed property.

Allow bad debts to be deducted on the return for the period during which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant’s books and records and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax purposes. For purposes of this subsection, a claimant who is not required to file federal income tax returns may deduct a bad debt on a return filed for the period in which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant’s books and records and would be eligible for a bad debt deduction for federal income tax purposes if the claimant was required to file a federal income tax return.

Require that, if a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount so collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the period in which the collection is made.

Provide that, when the amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales for the period during which the bad debt is written off, a refund claim may be filed within the member state’s otherwise applicable statute of limitations for refund claims. However, the statute of limitations shall be measured from the due date of the return on which the bad debt could first be claimed.

When filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified service provider, allow the certified service provider to claim, on behalf of the seller, any bad debt allowance provided by this section. The certified service provider must credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received to the seller.

Provide that, for the purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously claimed bad debt, any payments made on a debt or account are applied first proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the sales tax thereon and secondly to interest, service charges, and any other charges.

When the books and records of the party claiming the bad debt allowance support an allocation of the bad debts among the member states, permit the allocation.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1.

57-39.4-22. (321)
Confidentiality and privacy protections under model 1.

The purpose of this section is to set forth the member states’ policy for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all participants in the system and of the privacy interests of consumers who deal with model 1 sellers.

As used in this section, the term “confidential taxpayer information” means all information that is protected under a member state’s laws, regulations, and privileges, the term “personally identifiable information” means information that identifies a person, and the term “anonymous data” means information that does not identify a person.

The member states agree that a fundamental precept in model 1 is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity. With very limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without retaining the personally identifiable information of consumers.

The governing board may certify a certified service provider only if that certified service provider certifies that:

Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the fundamental precept of anonymity is respected;

Personally identifiable information is only used and retained to the extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to exempt purchasers and for proper identification of taxing jurisdictions;

It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its information practices, including what information it collects, how it collects the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at all, it retains the information and whether it discloses the information to member states. Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy policy statement accessible by the public on the official website of the certified service provider;

The collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable information will be limited to that required by the member states to ensure the validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a consumer’s status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased and for documentation of the correct assignment of taxing jurisdictions; and

It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from unauthorized access and disclosure.

Each member state shall provide public notification to consumers, including their exempt purchasers, of the state’s practices relating to the collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable information.

When any personally identifiable information that has been collected and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth in subdivision d of subsection 4, such information shall no longer be retained by the member states.

When personally identifiable information regarding an individual is retained by or on behalf of a member state, such state shall provide reasonable access by such individual to the individual’s own information in the state’s possession and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.

If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by that state’s law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally identifiable information, the state from which the information is sought should make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of such request.

This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by member states’ attorneys general or other appropriate state government authority.

Each member state’s laws and regulations regarding the collection, use, and maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully applicable and binding. Without limitation, the agreement does not enlarge or limit the member states’ authority to:

Conduct audits or other review as provided under the agreement and state law.

Provide records pursuant to a member state’s freedom of information act, disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations.

Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosures of confidential taxpayer information.

Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosures or misuse of federal return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the internal revenue service.

Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data for governmental purposes.

This privacy policy does not preclude the governing board from certifying a certified service provider whose privacy policy is more protective of confidential taxpayer information or personally identifiable information than is required by the agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 582, § 1; 2009, ch. 556, § 12.